Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1055
Service user, defined.

Service user means any person who initiates a 911 call to receive emergency services.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1023;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 37.